Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
moneys appropriated to the Employment Department by  sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act,
but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds other than those described in section 2 of this
2023 Act, collected or received by the Employment Department:
(1) Unemployment insurance,
shared services, workforce
operations, contributions and
recovery, and workforce
and economic research ............. $216,097,315
(2) Office of Administrative
Hearings.................................... $ 39,851,798
(3) Family and medical leave
insurance program.................... $ 88,789,337
(4) Modernization Initiative............ $ 69,047,163
SECTION 2.
(1) There is appropriated to the  Employment Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2023, out of the modernization funds made available to the state  on June
4, 2009, and July 16, 2009, under section 903(f) of the Social  Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1103(f)),
as amended, the  amount of $46,220,805 to be used for the purposes of administering unem-
ployment compensation law and public employment offices and for debt service and  capital
improvements.
(2) Expenditures of funds appropriated to the Employment Department under this section
are limited by section 1 (1), (3) and (4) of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) There is appropriated  to the Employment Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2023, out of the Employment Department Special Administrative  Fund es-
tablished in ORS 657.822, the amount of $55,000,000 to be used  for the purposes of adminis-
tering unemployment compensation law and public  employment offices and for debt service
and capital improvements.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5507 (SB 5507-A) Page 1
(2) Expenditures of funds appropriated to the Employment Department under this section
are limited by section 1 (1), (3) and (4) of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$178,751,667 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds, other than those described in section 2 of this  2023
Act, collected or received by the Employment Department.
SECTION 5. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, expenditures by the Employment
Department for unemployment insurance claims  from the Unemployment Compensation
Trust Fund are not limited.
(2) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, expenditures by the Employment Department
for benefits paid from the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund are not limited.
(3) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, expenditures by the Employment Department
for benefits  paid under the federal Trade Act and for unemployment insurance claims from
federal funds are not limited.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5507 (SB 5507-A) Page 2